District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.52

Proof required for each registered vehicle.

No vehicle shall be or continue to be registered in the name of any person required to file proof of financial responsibility for the future unless such proof shall be furnished for such vehicle.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 133, ch. 222, § 52
1981 Ed., § 40-452.
1973 Ed., § 40-468.